South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3639.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 11, Chapter 13, Title 7 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 7-13-1180. Notwithstanding another provision of law, the county chairperson of a certified political party attending a hand count audit conducted following a party primary or statewide election as provided in Section 7-3-20(D)(19) may, in his discretion, instruct the respective county board of voter registration and elections to expand the scope of the hand count audit to include up to three additional precinct races, and the county board of voter registration and elections must grant the hand count audit request at said meeting. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----